Illinois, session 104th, HB3598.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 12-205.1 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/12-205.1)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 12-205.1)7    Sec. 12-205.1. Implements of husbandry or slow-moving 8vehicles; display -Display of amber signal lamp; corn head 9attachment. Every animal drawn vehicle, farm tractor, 10implement of husbandry, and special mobile equipment, except 11when used for road construction or maintenance within the 12limits of a construction or maintenance project where traffic 13control devices are used in compliance with the applicable 14provisions of the manual and specifications adopted under 15Section 11-301 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, when operated on 16a highway during a time when lighted lamps are required by 17Section 12-201 of this Chapter, shall display to the rear at 18least one flashing amber signal lamp mounted as high as 19practicable and of sufficient intensity to be visible for a 20distance of at least 500 feet in normal sunlight; provided, 21that only the rearmost vehicle of a combination of vehicles 22coupled together need display such lamp. The flashing amber 23signal lamp may be operated lighted during daylight hours when   HB3598- 2 -LRB104 08901 LNS 18956 b1other lamps are not required to be lighted when vehicles 2authorized in this Section are operated on a highway. 3Implements of husbandry manufactured on or after January 1, 42003 and operated on public roads between sunset and sunrise 5shall display markings and lighting that meet or exceed the 6design, performance, and mounting specifications adopted by 7the American Society of Agricultural Engineers and published 8by that body as ASAE S279.11 APR01. 9    No animal drawn vehicle, farm tractor, implement of 10husbandry, or special mobile equipment shall operate on a 11public roadway in this State with a corn head attachment 12affixed to the animal drawn vehicle, farm tractor, implement 13of husbandry, or special mobile equipment. 14(Source: P.A. 91-505, eff. 1-1-00; 92-820, eff. 8-21-02.)